test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-mithwasin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mithwasin

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg
      

      # Prs # Ind
      mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg
      mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Sg: mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Sg
      mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Pl: mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Pl
      mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Pl: mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Pl
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg
      PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg
      PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl
      PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: PV/e+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg
      PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Sg: PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Sg
      PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Pl: PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Pl
      PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Pl: PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Pl
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/e+PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: PV/e+PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg
      PV/e+PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: PV/e+PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg
      PV/e+PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: PV/e+PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl
      PV/e+PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: PV/e+PV/ki+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg
      PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Sg: PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Sg
      PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Pl: PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Pl
      PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Pl: PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Pl
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/e+PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: PV/e+PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg
      PV/e+PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: PV/e+PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg
      PV/e+PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: PV/e+PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl
      PV/e+PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: PV/e+PV/wi+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Sg
      PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Sg: PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Sg
      PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Pl: PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+3Pl
      PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Pl: PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Ind+4Pl
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg
      PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg
      PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl
      PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: PV/ka+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: PV/ta+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg
      PV/ta+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: PV/ta+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg
      PV/ta+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: PV/ta+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl
      PV/ta+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: PV/ta+mithwasin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl
      

      # Fut # Cond
      mithwasin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mithwasin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg
      mithwasin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: mithwasin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg
      mithwasin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mithwasin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl
      mithwasin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: mithwasin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl
      
